Nebraska, session 109, LB486.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB486 LB486
2025 2025
Section 1. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
implement a standard reimbursement rate for service providers under the
aged and disabled personal care services waiver. Such rate shall be
consistent with the rate study report provided to the State of Nebraska
by CBIZ Optumas dated December 7, 2022, and shall be rebased not less
than once every two years.
-2-